Missouri, session 2026, HB1657.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 513, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 513.478, to read as follows:
513.478. 1. As used in the section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Eligible person":
(a) Any resident of this state sixty-two years of age or older receiving Social
Security retirement or Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits under Title II or
XVI of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Any resident of this state who is an honorably discharged veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States receiving compensation, pension, or disability
benefits administered under Title 38 of the United States Code;
(2) "Primary residence", the dwelling and contiguous real property owned and
occupied by an eligible person as his or her principal home;
(3) "Protected income", funds derived from Social Security benefits or veterans'
disability compensation, whether directly received or used to make mortgage or
property-related payments.
2. (1) No primary residence owned and occupied by an eligible person shall be
subject to attachment, execution, levy, garnishment, lien, or forced sale under any legal
or equitable process arising from a civil judgment or debt if the mortgage, tax,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1657 2
insurance, or maintenance payments on the primary residence are made in whole or in
part with protected income.
(2) This exemption shall apply regardless of the commingling of protected funds
with other funds, so long as the eligible person can demonstrate, through reasonable
documentation, that protected income is regularly applied to the primary residence's
expenses.
(3) The exemption established under this subsection shall be in addition to and
independent of any other homestead exemption provided under section 513.475 or other
law.
3. The exemption established under this section shall not apply to:
(1) Property tax liens owed to the state or a political subdivision;
(2) Mortgages or deeds of trust voluntarily executed by the homeowner; or
(3) Federally authorized offsets for child support, alimony, or criminal
restitution.
4. (1) In any civil proceeding in which a creditor seeks to execute a judgment
against real property, the court shall, upon claim by the debtor or the debtor's
representative, hold a hearing to determine whether the exemption applies.
(2) The eligible person shall submit evidence of age, veteran status, and proof of
protected income.
(3) Upon finding that the property qualifies for an exemption under this section,
the court shall issue an order permanently enjoining any sale, levy, or lien enforcement
against the residence.
5. (1) Any creditor, collection agency, or legal entity that knowingly initiates or
continues with an enforcement action in violation of this section shall be liable for:
(a) Actual damages;
(b) Statutory damages of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars per
occurrence; and
(c) Reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.
(2) The attorney general shall have authority to bring civil actions for injunctive
relief or penalties for violations of this section.
✔